Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB579.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and sections 1 and 2 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act, are amended to read:AN ACTLicensing and regulating the practice of social work, marriage and family therapy, professional counseling and professional music therapy; providing penalties; and making an appropriation.Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Social 123456789101112131415161718 Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional Music Therapists Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The practice of social work, marriage and family therapy [and], professional counseling and professional music therapy within this Commonwealth is hereby declared to affect the public safety and welfare and to be subject to regulation and control in the public interest to protect the public from unprofessional, improper, unauthorized and unqualified practice of licensed social work, licensed marriage and family therapy [and], licensed professional counseling and licensed professional music therapy. This act regulates only those who hold themselves out as licensed social workers, licensed clinical social workers, licensed marriage and family therapists [or as], licensed professional counselors or as licensed professional music therapists. Acquisition of a license under this act shall not be made a condition of the employment of a person by the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions or by nonprofit agencies.Section 2. The definition of "board" in section 3 of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Board." The State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional Music Therapists under the Bureau of Professional 20250SB0579PN0587 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Occupational Affairs within the Department of State.* * *"Independent practice of music therapy." The application of professional music therapy knowledge and skills by an individual:(1) who styles oneself as a professional music therapist;(2) who regulates and is responsible for the individual's own practice and treatment procedures; and(3) whose practice is not affiliated with any other practice, health care facility, government agency or government-regulated social service agency.* * *"Licensed professional music therapist." A person who engages in the practice of music therapy and who holds a current license under this act.* * *"Practice of music therapy." As follows:(1) The clinical and evidence-based use of music interventions to accomplish individualized goals for individuals of all ages and ability levels within a therapeutic relationship by a licensed professional music therapist. Professional m usic therapists develop an individualized music therapy treatment plan for a client or group of clients that identifies the goals, objectives and potential strategies of the music therapy services appropriate for the client or group of clients using music therapy interventions, including, but not limited to, music improvisation, receptive music listening, song-writing, lyric discussion, music and imagery, music performance, learning 20250SB0579PN0587 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through music and movement to music.(2) The term includes:(i) Accepting referrals for music therapy services from medical, developmental, mental health or education professionals, family members, clients, caregivers or others involved and authorized with provision of client services.(ii) Conducting a music therapy assessment of a client to determine if treatment is indicated. If treatment is indicated, the licensed professional music therapist collects systematic, comprehensive and accurate information necessary to determine the appropriate type of music therapy services to provide for the client.(iii) Developing an individualized music therapy treatment plan for a client that is based upon the results of the music therapy assessment.(iv) Carrying out an individualized music therapy treatment plan that is consistent with other medical, developmental, rehabilitative, habilitating, mental health, preventive, wellness care or educational services being provided to a client.(v) Evaluating a client's response to music therapy a nd the individualized music therapy treatment plan, documenting change and progress and suggesting modifications, as appropriate.(vi) Developing a plan for determining when the provision of music therapy services is no longer needed in collaboration with the client, a physician or other provider of health care or education of the client, the family or caregiver of the client and any other 20250SB0579PN0587 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate person upon whom the client relies for support.(vii) Minimizing barriers to ensure a client may receive music therapy services in the least restrictive environment.(viii) Collaborating with and educating the client and the family or caregiver of the client or any other appropriate person about the needs of the client that are being addressed in music therapy and the manner in which the music therapy addresses those needs.(ix) Utilizing appropriate knowledge and skill to improve the practice of music therapy, including the use of research, reasoning and problem-solving skills to determine appropriate actions in the context of each specific clinical setting.(3) The term does not include:(i) The screening, diagnosis or assessment of any physical, mental or communication disorder. (ii) A person whose training and national certification attests to the person's preparation and ability to practice the certified profession or occupation, if the person does not represent that the person is a music therapist.(iii) The practice of music therapy as an integral part of a program of study for a student enrolled in an accredited music therapy program, if the student does not represent that the student is a music therapist.(iv) A person who engages in the practice of music therapy under the supervision of a licensed professional music therapist, if the person does not represent that 20250SB0579PN0587 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the person is a music therapist. * * *"Professional music therapist." A person who has acquired the necessary education and qualifications to apply to be a licensed professional music therapist under this act and engage in the practice of music therapy in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 3. Sections 4, 5 heading, (a), (c) and (l) and 6(2) and (3) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), are amended to read:Section 4. License required.It shall be unlawful for any person to [hold oneself forth as] represent that the person is a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed associate marriage and family therapist, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed associate professional counselor [or], licensed professional counselor or licensed professional music therapist unless [he or she] the person shall first have obtained a license pursuant to this act.Section 5. State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional Music Therapists.(a) Creation.--There is hereby created the State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional Music Therapists, a departmental administrative board in the Department of State. The board shall consist of [13] 15 members who are citizens of the United States and who have been residents of this Commonwealth for a two-year period, two of whom shall be public members; five of whom shall be licensed social workers, at least 20250SB0579PN0587 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 one of whom shall be a licensed clinical social worker and at least one of whom shall be a licensed social worker; two of whom shall be licensed marriage and family therapists; two of whom shall be licensed professional counselors; two of whom shall be licensed professional music therapists with a master's degree or higher in music therapy or a related field; one of whom shall be either a licensed marriage and family therapist or a licensed professional counselor whose membership shall rotate between those professions at the expiration of the member's second term; and one of whom shall be the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs.* * *(c) Initial appointments.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this act, the Governor shall nominate one professional member to serve as a clinical social worker member of the board; three professional members to serve as professional counselor members of the board, one of whom shall serve a two-year term, one of whom shall serve a three-year term and one of whom shall serve a four-year term; two professional members to serve as the marriage and family therapist members of the board, one of whom shall serve a two-year term and one of whom shall serve a four-year term[.]; and two professional members to serve as the licensed professional music therapist members of the board, one of whom shall serve a two-year term and one of whom shall serve a four-year term. The professional members of the board initially appointed pursuant to this subsection need not be licensed by the licensure examination adopted by the board but, at the time of appointment, must have satisfied the education and experience requirements of this act for licensure as a clinical social worker, a marriage and family therapist [or], a 20250SB0579PN0587 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional counselor or a licensed professional music therapist.* * *(l) Operating procedures.--The board shall meet within 30 days after the appointment of its new members and set up operating procedures and develop application forms for licensing clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapists, associate professional counselors [and], professional counselors and professional music therapists. It shall be the responsibility of the board to circulate these forms and educate the public to the requirements of licensing in order to hold oneself out as a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed associate marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed associate professional counselor [or], licensed professional counselor or professional music therapist within [the] this Commonwealth.Section 6. Powers and functions of board.The board shall have the following powers:* * *(2) To adopt and, from time to time, revise such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this act. Such regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, standards of professional practice and conduct for licensed bachelor social workers, licensed social workers, licensed clinical social workers, licensed associate marriage and family therapists, licensed marriage and family therapists, licensed associate professional counselors [and], licensed professional counselors and 20250SB0579PN0587 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional music therapist in Pennsylvania.(3) To examine for, deny, approve, issue, revoke, suspend or renew licenses of bachelor social workers, social workers, clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapists, associate professional counselors [and], professional counselors and professional music therapist pursuant to this act and to conduct hearings in connection therewith.* * *Section 4. Section 7 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 7. Qualifications for license.* * *(h) Professional music therapist license.--An applicant shall be qualified for a license to hold oneself out as a licensed professional music therapist, provided the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that:(1) The applicant is of good moral character.(2) The applicant has completed the education and clinical training requirements established by the American Music Therapy Association or any successor organization.(3) The applicant provides proof of passing the examination for board certification offered by the Certification Board for Music Therapists or any successor organization or provides proof of being transitioned into board certification, and provides proof that the applicant is currently a board certified music therapist.(4) The applicant remains actively certified by the Certification Board for Music Therapists.(5) The applicant has submitted an application 20250SB0579PN0587 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accompanied by the application fee.(6) The applicant has not been convicted of a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, unless:(i) at least ten years have elapsed from the date of conviction;(ii) the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the applicant has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction, such that licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the applicant's clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violation; and(iii) the applicant otherwise satisfies the qualifications contained in or authorized by this act.As used in this paragraph, the term "convicted" shall include a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.Section 5. Sections 8(b) and 10(a) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), are amended to read:Section 8. Procedures for licensing.* * *(b) Issuance of license.--The board shall issue to each person who meets the licensure requirements of this act a certificate setting forth that such person is licensed to [hold oneself out as] represent that the person is a licensed bachelor 20250SB0579PN0587 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 social worker, a licensed social worker, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed associate marriage and family therapist, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed associate professional counselor [or], a licensed professional counselor or professional music therapist.Section 10. Reciprocity.(a) General rule.--The board shall have the power to grant a reciprocal license to an applicant who is licensed or certified as a bachelor social worker, social worker, clinical social worker, associate marriage and family therapist, marriage and family therapist, associate professional counselor [or], professional counselor or professional music therapist in another state and has demonstrated qualifications which equal or exceed those required pursuant to this act in the determination of the board, provided that no license shall be granted under this section to an applicant unless the state in which the applicant is licensed affords reciprocal treatment to persons who are residents of this Commonwealth and who are licensed pursuant to this act.* * *Section 6. Section 10.1 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 10.1. Endorsement of out-of-State licenses.* * *(d) Professional music therapist license.--The board may issue a professional music therapist license without examination to an applicant holding a professional music therapist license in another state who submits proof satisfactory to the board of all of the following:(1) The applicant is of good moral character.20250SB0579PN0587 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The applicant meets the educational requirements, including clinical training as specified in section 7(h).(3) The applicant holds a music therapy license that is in good standing from another state.(4) The applicant has, at a minimum, been actively engaged in the practice of music therapy for five of the last seven years immediately preceding the filing of the application for licensure by endorsement with the board.(5) The applicant has submitted an application accompanied by the application fee.(6) The applicant has not been convicted of a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, unless:(i) at least ten years have elapsed from the date of conviction;(ii) the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the applicant has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction, such that licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the applicant's clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violation; and(iii) the applicant otherwise satisfies the qualifications contained in or authorized by this act.As used in this paragraph, the term "convicted" shall include a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo 20250SB0579PN0587 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contendere.Section 7. Section 12 of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), is amended to read:Section 12. Reinstatement of license.Unless ordered to do so by Commonwealth Court or an appeal therefrom, the board shall not reinstate the license of a person to practice as a bachelor social worker, social worker, clinical social worker, associate marriage and family therapist, marriage and family therapist, associate professional counselor [or], professional counselor pursuant or professional music therapist to this act, which has been revoked. Any person whose license has been revoked may apply for reinstatement, after a period of at least five years, but must meet all of the licensing qualifications of this act, including the examination requirement, if [he or she] the person desires to practice as a bachelor social worker, social worker, clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist [or], professional counselor or professional music therapist pursuant to this act at any time after such revocation.Section 8. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 16.7. Practice of music therapy and restrictions on use of title "Licensed Professional Music Therapist."(a) Before treatment.--(1) Before providing music therapy services to a client for an identified clinical or developmental need, the licensed professional music therapist shall review with the health care provider involved in the client's care the client's diagnosis, treatment needs and treatment plan.(2) Before providing music therapy services to an individual for an identified educational need, the licensed 20250SB0579PN0587 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional music therapist shall review with the individualized family service plan team or individualized education program team the individual's diagnosis, treatment needs and treatment plan.(b) During treatment.--(1) When providing music therapy services to a client, the licensed professional music therapist shall collaborate, as applicable, with the client's treatment team, including physician, psychologist, licensed social worker or other mental health professional.(2) When providing music therapy services to a client with a communication disorder, the licensed professional music therapist shall collaborate and discuss the music therapy treatment plan with the client's audiologist or speech-language pathologist. When providing educational or health care services, a licensed professional music therapist may not replace the services provided by an audiologist or a speech-language pathologist. Unless authorized to practice speech-language pathology, music therapists may not evaluate, examine, instruct or counsel on speech, language, communication and swallowing disorders and conditions.(c) Use of title.--Only individuals who have received licenses as licensed professional music therapists under this act may style themselves as licensed professional music therapists and use the letters "L.P.M.T." in connection with their names. It shall be unlawful for an individual to style oneself as a licensed professional music therapist, a music therapist or use any words or symbols indicating or tending to indicate that the individual is a licensed professional music therapist or a music therapist without holding a license in good 20250SB0579PN0587 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standing under this act.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person who is licensed or certified to practice a profession by a Commonwealth agency or board from practicing within the scope of that license or certificate or as otherwise authorized by law so long as the person does not represent themselves as a music therapist.(e) Communication disorders.--A licensed professional music therapist may not represent to the public that the licensed professional music therapist is authorized to treat a communication disorder. This does not prohibit a licensed professional music therapist from representing to the public that the licensed professional music therapist works with clients who have a communication disorder and addresses communication skills.Section 9. Section 17(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 17. Penalties.* * *(b) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board, by a vote of the majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board as provided by law, or by a vote of the majority of the duly qualified and confirmed membership or a minimum of three members, whichever is greater, may levy a civil penalty of up to $10,000 on any current licensee who violates any provision of this act, on any person who engages in the independent practice of clinical social work, the independent practice of marriage and family therapy [or], the independent practice of professional counseling or the independent practice of music therapy without being licensed pursuant to this act or 20250SB0579PN0587 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on any person who [holds himself or herself out as] represents that the person is a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional counselor [or], marriage and family therapist or licensed professional music therapist without being so licensed pursuant to this act. The board shall levy this penalty only after affording the accused party the opportunity for a hearing, as provided in Title 2 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes (relating to administrative law and procedure).* * *Section 10. Sections 18(b) and 20(a) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), are amended to read:Section 18. License renewal; records and fees.* * *(b) Records.--A record of all persons licensed to practice as bachelor social workers, social workers, clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapists, associate professional counselors [and], professional counselors and music therapists in Pennsylvania shall be kept in the office of the board and shall be open to public inspection and copying upon payment of a nominal fee for copying the record. * * *Section 20. Unlawful practice.(a) Unlawful practice prohibited.--It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the independent practice of clinical social work, the independent practice of marriage and family therapy [or], the independent practice of professional counseling or the independent practice of music therapy or [hold 20250SB0579PN0587 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 oneself out as] represent that the person is a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed associate marriage and family therapist, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed associate professional counselor [and], licensed professional counselor and licensed professional music therapist without possessing a valid, unexpired, unrevoked and unsuspended license issued under this act.* * *Section 11. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0579PN0587 - 17 - 12345678910